South Dakota, session 2026, HB1322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 24-5-3 be AMENDED:
24-5-3. If not already provided, Upon discharge of an inmate from a correctional
facility, whether by parole, suspended sentence, or final discharge, a correctional facility
official shall must provide every the inmate with suitable:
(1) Suitable clothing, a;
(2) A sum of money to be determined by the secretary of corrections, and
transportation; and
(3) Transportation to the place one of the following locations, as chosen by the inmate:
(a) The county where the inmate resided at the time of the offense that resulted
in imprisonment;
(b) The county where the inmate received sentence; or an
(c) A location equivalent in distance upon discharge from a correctional facility,
whether by parole, suspended sentence, or final discharge to either
subsection (a) or (b), whichever is lesser in mileage.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.